Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1717.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7715. Exemption of records from access . Records of a volunteer EMS company, volunteer fire company or volunteer rescue company, as those terms are defined in section 7802 (relating to definitions), and volunteer firefighters' relief association, as defined under section 7412 (relating to definitions), are exempt from access under the provisions of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law , except that section 506(d) of the Right-to-Know Law shall apply to a volunteer EMS company, volunteer fire company or a volunteer rescue company that contracts with a Commonwealth agency or local agency.12345678910111213141516171819 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1717PN2113 - 2 - 1